District of Columbia statutes.
42-3509.03

Supersedure.

This chapter shall be considered to supersede the Rental Accommodations Act of 1975, the Rental Housing Act of 1977, and the Rental Housing Act of 1980, except that a petition filed with the Rent Administrator under the Rental Housing Act of 1980 shall be determined under the provisions of the Rental Housing Act of 1980.

History

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 903, 32 DCR 3089

Cross References

Rental Accommodations Act of 1975, and the Rental Housing Acts of 1977 and 1980, definitions, see § 42-3501.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2593.

Expiration of Law

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3509.01.